Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1151
Residential schools; emergency cash fund; established; use.

An emergency cash fund shall be established on behalf of any school as provided for by sections 79-1148 and 79-1149. The fund shall not exceed five hundred dollars. Such emergency cash fund shall be used to provide for immediate and unusual needs as may be required and shall be reimbursed from the General Fund appropriation of each such school.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 833.